Missouri, session 2026, HB2796.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 9.413, to read as follows:
9.413. November twenty-fourth each year is hereby designated as "Frankie
Muse Freeman Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
participate in appropriate events and activities to celebrate Frankie Muse Freeman, a
St. Louis attorney who was a champion for civil rights, won a landmark case that ended
legal racial discrimination in St. Louis public housing, and was the first black woman
appointed to the United States Commission on Civil Rights by president Lyndon B.
Johnson.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.